Georgia statutes. TITLE 12 CONSERVATION AND NATURAL RESOURCES
PART 1
H

AZARDOUS WASTE MANAGEMENT

Editor's notes.

- Ga. L. 1992, p. 2234,

§

5 designated the existing provisions of Article 3, Code Sections 12-8-60 through 12-8-83, as Part 1.

12-8-60. Short title.

This part
shall be known as and may be cited as the "Georgia Hazardous Waste Management Act."

(Ga. L. 1979, p. 1127, § 1; Ga. L. 1992, p. 2234, § 5.)

Law reviews.

-
For annual survey on environmental law, see 70 Mercer L. Rev. 1007 (2019).

12-8-61. Legislative policy.

It is declared to be the public policy of the State of Georgia, in furtherance of its responsibility to protect the public health, safety, and well-being of its citizens and to protect and enhance the quality of its environment, to institute and maintain a comprehensive state-wide program for the management of hazardous wastes through the regulation of the generation, transportation, storage, treatment, and disposal of hazardous wastes.

(Ga. L. 1979, p. 1127, § 2; Ga. L. 1992, p. 2234, § 5.)

12-8-62. Definitions.

As used in this part, the term:

"Board" means the Board of Natural Resources of the State of Georgia.

"Designated hazardous waste" means any solid waste identified as such in regulations promulgated by the board. The board may identify as "designated hazardous waste" any solid waste which the board concludes is capable of posing a substantial present or potential hazard to human health or the environment when improperly treated, stored, transported, or disposed of or otherwise managed, based on the factors set forth in regulations promulgated by the administrator of the United States Environmental Protection Agency pursuant to the federal act which are codified as 40 C.F.R. Section 261.11(a)(3), in force and effect on February 1, 2010, if such solid waste contains any substance which is listed on any one or more of the following lists:

List of Hazardous Constituents, codified as 40 C.F.R. Part 261, Appendix VIII, in force and effect on February 1, 2010;

Ground-water Monitoring List, codified as 40 C.F.R. Part 264, Appendix IX, in force and effect on February 1, 2010;

List of Hazardous Substances and Reportable Quantities, codified as 40 C.F.R. Table 302.4, and all appendices thereto, in force and effect on February 1, 2010;

List of Regulated Pesticides, codified as 40 C.F.R. Part 180, in force and effect on February 1, 2010;

List of Extremely Hazardous Substances and Their Threshold Planning Quantities, codified as 40 C.F.R. Part 355, Appendix A, in force and effect on February 1, 2010; or

List of Chemicals and Chemical Categories, codified as 40 C.F.R. Part 372.65 in force and effect on February 1, 2010.

"Director" means the director of the Environmental Protection Division of the Department of Natural Resources.

"Disposal" means the discharge, deposit, injection, dumping, spilling, leaking, or placing of any solid waste or hazardous waste into or on any land or water so that such solid waste or hazardous waste or any constituent thereof may enter the environment or be emitted into the air or discharged into any waters, including ground waters.

"Division" means the Environmental Protection Division of the Department of Natural Resources.

"Federal act" means the federal Solid Waste Disposal Act, as amended, particularly by the Resource Conservation and Recovery Act of 1976 (Public Law 94-580, 42 U.S.C. Section 6901, et seq.), as amended, particularly by but not limited to the Used Oil Recycling Act of 1980 (Public Law 96-463), the Solid Waste Disposal Act Amendments of 1980 (Public Law 96-482), the Comprehensive Environmental Response, Compensation, and Liability Act of 1980 (Public Law 96-510), the Hazardous and Solid Waste Amendments of 1984 (Public Law 98-616), and the Superfund Amendments and Reauthorization Act of 1986 (Public Law 99-499), as amended.

"Final disposition" means the location, time, and method by which hazardous waste loses its identity or enters the environment, including, but not limited to, disposal, disposal site closure and post closure, resource recovery, and treatment.

"Guarantor" means any person, other than the owner or operator, who provides evidence of financial responsibility for an owner or operator pursuant to this article.

"Hazardous constituent" means any substance listed as a hazardous constituent in regulations promulgated by the administrator of the United States Environmental Protection Agency pursuant to the federal act which are in force and effect on February 1, 2010, codified as Appendix VIII to 40 C.F.R. Part 261-Identification and Listing of Hazardous Waste.

"Hazardous waste" means any solid waste which has been defined as a hazardous waste in regulations promulgated by the administrator of the United States Environmental Protection Agency pursuant to the federal act which are in force and effect on February 1, 2010, codified as 40 C.F.R. Section 261.3 and any designated hazardous waste.

"Hazardous waste facility" means any property or facility that is intended or used for storage, treatment, or disposal of hazardous waste.

"Hazardous waste generation" means the act or process of producing hazardous waste.

"Hazardous waste management" means the systematic recognition and control of hazardous wastes from generation to final disposition or disposal, including, but not limited to, identification, containerization, labeling, storage, collection, source separation, transfer, transportation, processing, treatment, facility closure, post closure, perpetual care, resource recovery, and disposal.

"Land disposal" means any placement of hazardous waste in a landfill, surface impoundment, waste pile, injection well, land treatment facility, salt dome formation, salt bed formation, or underground mine or cave.

"Large quantity generator" means a hazardous waste generator who generates 2.2 pounds or more of acute hazardous waste or 2,200 pounds or more of hazardous waste in one month, as defined in the Rules for Hazardous Waste Management, Chapter 391-3-11, of the Board of Natural Resources.

"Manifest" means a form or document used for identifying the quantity and composition, and the origin, routing and destination, of hazardous waste during its transportation from the point of generation, through any intermediate points, to the point of disposal, treatment, or storage.

"Organization" means a legal entity, other than a government agency or authority, established or organized for any purpose, and such term includes a corporation, company, association, firm, partnership, joint stock company, foundation, institution, trust, society, union, or any other association of persons.

"Person" means an individual, trust, firm, joint stock company, corporation (including a government corporation), partnership, association, municipality, commission, or political subdivision, or any agency, board, department, or bureau of this state or of any other state or of the federal government.

"Serious bodily injury" means a bodily injury which involves a substantial risk of death, unconsciousness, extreme physical pain, protracted and obvious disfigurement, or protracted loss or impairment of the function of a bodily member, organ, or mental faculty.

"Solid waste" means solid waste as defined by regulations promulgated by the administrator of the United States Environmental Protection Agency pursuant to the federal act which are in force and effect on February 1, 2010, codified as 40 C.F.R. Sections 261.1, 261.2(a)-(d), and 261.4(a).

"Storage" means the containment or holding of hazardous waste, either on a temporary basis or for a period of years, in such a manner as not to constitute disposal of such hazardous waste.

"Transport" means the movement of hazardous waste from the point of generation to any point of final disposition, storage, or disposal, including any intermediate point.

"Treatment" means any method, technique, or process, including neutralization, designed to change the physical, chemical, or biological character or composition of any hazardous waste so as to neutralize such waste or so as to render such waste nonhazardous, safe for transport, amenable for recovery, amenable for storage, or reduced in volume. Such term includes any activity or processing designed to change the physical form or chemical composition of hazardous waste so as to render it nonhazardous.

"Waste reduction" means a practice, other than dewatering, dilution, or evaporation, by an environmental waste generator, including changes in production technology, materials, processes, operations or procedures or use of in-process, in-line, or closed loop recycling according to standard engineering practices, that reduces the environmental and health hazards associated with waste without diluting or concentrating the waste before release, handling, storage, transport, treatment, or disposal of the waste. The term does not include a practice applied to environmental waste after it is generated and exits a production or commercial operation. Waste reduction shall not in any way be inferred to promote, include, or require:

Waste burning in industrial furnaces, boilers, or cement kilns;

Transfer of an environmental waste from one environmental medium to another environmental medium (otherwise known as waste shifting);

Conversion of a potential waste into another form for use in a production process or operation without serving any substantial productive function;

Off-site waste recycling; or

Any other method of end-of-pipe management of environmental wastes.

(Ga. L. 1979, p. 1127, § 4; Ga. L. 1985, p. 266, §§ 1, 2; Ga. L. 1986, p. 10, § 12; Ga. L. 1986, p. 761, §§ 1, 2; Ga. L. 1987, p. 3, § 12; Ga. L. 1988, p. 727, § 1; Ga. L. 1990, p. 1427, § 1; Ga. L. 1991, p. 456, § 1; Ga. L. 1992, p. 2234, § 5; Ga. L. 1996, p. 319, § 2; Ga. L. 2006, p. 275, § 3-3/HB 1320; Ga. L. 2010, p. 531, § 4/SB 78; Ga. L. 2010, p. 828, § 1/SB 490.)

Editor's notes.

- Ga. L. 2006, p. 275,

§

1-1/HB 1320, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that: "This Act shall be known and may be cited as the 'Comprehensive Litter Prevention and Abatement Act of 2006."'

Ga. L. 2006, p. 275,

§

5-1/HB 1320, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that the Act shall become effective April 21, 2006, for purposes of adopting local ordinances to become effective on or after July 1, 2006.

U.S. Code.

- The federal Solid Waste Disposal Act, referred to in paragraph (6) of this Code section, was formerly codified at 42 U.S.C.

§

3251 et seq. The federal Solid Waste Disposal Act was amended, reorganized, and expanded by the federal Resource Conservation and Recovery Act of 1976, referred to and cited in paragraph (6) of this Code section.

12-8-63. Administration of article by division; enforcement of article by director.

The division shall be the state agency to administer this article. The director shall be the official charged with the primary responsibility for the enforcement of this article. In exercising any authority or power granted by this article and in fulfilling his duties under this article, the director shall conform to and implement the policies outlined in this article.

(Ga. L. 1979, p. 1127, § 2; Ga. L. 1992, p. 2234, § 5.)

12-8-64. Powers and duties of board as to hazardous waste.

In the performance of its duties, the board shall have and may exercise the power to:

Adopt, promulgate, modify, amend, and repeal rules and regulations to implement and enforce the provisions of this article as the board may deem necessary to provide for the control and management of hazardous waste to protect the environment and the health of humans. Such rules and regulations may be applicable to the state as a whole or may vary from area to area, as may be appropriate to facilitate the accomplishment of the provisions, purposes, and policies of this article. The rules and regulations shall include, but shall not be limited to, the following:

Rules and regulations governing and controlling standards applicable to hazardous waste generators, hazardous waste transporters, and owners or operators of hazardous waste treatment, storage, or disposal facilities. These rules and regulations may include measures to ensure that hazardous waste management practices are regulated, governed, and controlled in the public interest. Such measures may include, but shall not be limited to:

The establishment of record-keeping procedures;

Requirements calling for the submission of reports to the director; and

The establishment of monitoring practices;

Rules and regulations governing and controlling the treatment, storage, and disposal of hazardous waste;

Rules and regulations specifying the terms, provisions, and conditions under which the director shall issue, modify, amend, revoke, or deny permits pursuant to this article;

Rules and regulations governing and controlling hazardous waste management;

Rules and regulations establishing procedures and requirements for the reporting of the generation of hazardous wastes and governing and controlling the activities of hazardous waste generators;

Rules and regulations establishing standards and procedures for the operation and maintenance of hazardous waste facilities;

Rules and regulations establishing the use of a manifest during the generation and handling of hazardous wastes;

Rules and regulations establishing procedures to ensure public access to records and to ensure protection of trade secrets and confidential information, the disclosure of which to the director is required by this article or the rules and regulations adopted under this article;

Rules and regulations establishing procedures and requirements for the use and disposition of hazardous waste or hazardous constituents;

Rules and regulations deleting certain solid wastes from the definition of hazardous waste;

Rules and regulations exempting from some or all regulation certain small quantities of hazardous waste;

Rules and regulations exempting from some or all regulation certain hazardous wastes that are recyclable; and

Rules and regulations designating certain solid wastes as designated hazardous wastes; and

Take all necessary steps to ensure the effective enforcement of this article.

(Ga. L. 1979, p. 1127, § 5; Ga. L. 1985, p. 266, § 3; Ga. L. 1988, p. 727, § 2; Ga. L. 1992, p. 2234, § 5.)

Administrative Rules and Regulations.

- Hazardous waste management, Official Compilation of the Rules and Regulations of the State of Georgia, Georgia Department of Natural Resources, Environmental Protection, Subject 391-3-11.

12-8-65. Powers and duties of director as to hazardous waste.

The director shall have and may exercise the following powers and duties:

To exercise general supervision over the administration and enforcement of this article and all rules and regulations, orders, or permits promulgated or issued under this article;

To encourage, participate in, or conduct studies, reviews, investigations, research, and demonstrations relating to hazardous waste management practices in this state as he deems advisable and necessary;

To issue all permits contemplated by this article, stipulating in each permit the conditions or limitations under which such permit is issued, and to deny, revoke, modify, or amend such permits;

To make investigations, analyses, and inspections to determine and ensure compliance with this article, the rules and regulations promulgated under this article, and any permits or orders which the director may issue;

To enter into such contracts as may be required or necessary to effectuate this article or the rules and regulations promulgated under this article;

To prepare, develop, amend, modify, submit, and enforce any comprehensive plan or program sufficient to comply with this article or the federal act, or both, for the control, regulation, and monitoring of hazardous waste management practices in this state;

To develop and implement plans to achieve goals and objectives set by any comprehensive plan or program;

To conduct such public hearings as are required by this article or as he deems necessary for the proper administration of this article and to control and manage the conduct and procedure for such public hearings;

To advise, consult, cooperate, and contract on hazardous waste management matters with other agencies of this state, political subdivisions thereof, and other designated organizations or entities, and, with the approval of the Governor, to negotiate and enter into agreements with the governments of other states and the United States and their several agencies, subdivisions, or designated organizations or entities, provided that nothing in this article shall authorize the division to own or operate a hazardous waste storage, treatment, or disposal facility;

To collect and disseminate information and to provide for public notification in matters relating to hazardous waste management;

To issue, amend, modify, or revoke orders as may be necessary to ensure and enforce compliance with this article and all rules or regulations promulgated under this article;

To institute, in the name of the division, proceedings of mandamus, injunction, or other proper administrative, civil, or criminal proceedings to enforce this article, the rules and regulations promulgated under this article, or any orders or permits issued under this article;

To accept, receive, administer, or disburse grants from public or private sources for the purpose of the proper administration of this article or for the purpose of carrying out any of the duties, powers, or responsibilities under this article;

To grant variances in accordance with this article and the rules and regulations promulgated under this article, provided that such variances are not inconsistent with the federal act and rules or regulations promulgated thereunder;

To encourage voluntary cooperation by persons and affected groups to achieve the purposes of this article;

To assure that the State of Georgia complies with the federal act and retains maximum control thereunder and receives all desired federal grants, aid, and other benefits;

To require any person who is generating, transporting, treating, storing, or disposing of hazardous waste to notify the division in writing, within a reasonable number of days which the director shall specify, of the location and general description of such activity and identifying the hazardous waste handled, and any other information which may be deemed relevant, under such conditions as the director may prescribe;

To maintain an inventory of hazardous wastes within the state, including such information as location, identity, quantity, method of storage, rate of accumulation, disposal practices, and any other information which the director may deem necessary to administer and enforce this article;

To exclude from regulation under this article the solid waste at any particular generating facility if it is determined that such solid waste does not pose a danger to human health or the environment;

To establish hazardous waste management standards for the state, provided that they are in all cases not less stringent than those standards provided by the federal act;

To take all necessary steps to ensure that the administration of this article is consistent with and equivalent to the provisions of the federal act and any standards, rules, or regulations promulgated thereunder toward the end that the State of Georgia shall have maximum control over hazardous waste management practices in this state; and

To exercise all incidental powers necessary to carry out the purposes of this article.

The powers and duties described in subsection (a) of this Code section may be exercised and performed by the director through such duly authorized agents and employees as he deems necessary and proper.

(Ga. L. 1979, p. 1127, § 6; Ga. L. 1988, p. 727, § 3; Ga. L. 1992, p. 2234, § 5; Ga. L. 1996, p. 6, § 12.)

Cross references.

- Permits for disposal of radioactive wastes,

§

31-13-7

.

12-8-65.1. Hazardous waste reduction plans; specific performance goals; biennial progress reports; rules and regulations.

By not later than March 1, 1992, large quantity hazardous waste generators shall develop hazardous waste reduction plans and submit such plans to the director. At a minimum, the plans shall include:

A written policy articulating upper management and corporate support for the generator's hazardous waste reduction plan and a commitment to implement plan goals;

The scope and objectives of the plan, including the evaluation of technologies, procedures, and personnel training programs to ensure unnecessary hazardous waste is not generated and specific goals for hazardous waste reduction, based on what is technically and economically practical;

Internal analysis of hazardous waste streams, with periodic hazardous waste reduction assessments, to review individual processes or facilities and other activities where hazardous waste may be generated and identify opportunities to reduce or eliminate hazardous waste generation. Such assessments shall evaluate data on the types, amount, and hazardous constituents of hazardous waste generated, where and why that hazardous waste was generated within the production process or other operations, and potential hazardous waste reduction and recycling techniques applicable to those hazardous wastes;

Hazardous waste accounting systems that identify hazardous waste management costs and factor in liability, compliance, and oversight costs to the extent technically and economically practical;

Employee awareness and training programs to involve employees in hazardous waste reduction planning and implementation to the maximum extent feasible;

Institutionalization of the plan to ensure an ongoing effort as demonstrated by incorporation of the plan into management practice and procedures; and

Implementation of technically and economically practical hazardous waste reduction options, including a plan for implementation.

As part of each hazardous waste reduction plan developed under subsection (a) of this Code section, each large quantity hazardous waste generator shall establish specific performance goals for the reduction of hazardous waste. Wherever technically and economically practical, the specific performance goals established under this subsection shall be expressed in numeric terms. If the establishment of numeric performance goals is not practical, the performance goals shall include a clearly stated list of objectives designed to lead to the establishment of numeric goals as soon as practical. Each large quantity hazardous waste generator shall explain the rationale for each performance goal. The rationale for a particular performance goal shall address any impediments to hazardous waste reduction, including but not limited to the following:

The availability of technically practical hazardous waste reduction methods, including any anticipated changes in the future;

Previously implemented reductions of hazardous waste; and

The economic practicability of available hazardous waste reduction methods, including any anticipated changes in the future.

Examples of situations where hazardous waste reduction may not be economically practical as provided for in paragraph (3) of subsection (b) of this Code section include but are not limited to:

For valid reasons of priority, a particular company may choose first to address other more serious hazardous waste reduction concerns;

Necessary steps to reduce hazardous waste are likely to have significant adverse impacts on product quality; or

Legal or existing contractual obligations interfere with the necessary steps that would lead to hazardous waste reduction.

All large quantity hazardous waste generators shall complete biennially a hazardous waste reduction progress report. A biennial progress report shall:

Analyze and quantify progress made, if any, in hazardous waste reduction, relative to each performance goal established under subsection (b) of this Code section; and

Set forth amendments to the hazardous waste reduction plan and explain the need for the amendments.

The board may adopt and promulgate such rules and regulations as may be necessary to further define and implement the provisions of this Code section and Code Section

12-8-65.2

, provided such rules and regulations are supplemental to and not in conflict with this Code section and Code Section

12-8-65.2

.

(Code 1981, §

12-8-65.1

, enacted by Ga. L. 1990, p. 1427, § 2; Ga. L. 1992, p. 2234, § 5.)

Code Commission notes.

- Pursuant to Code Section 28-9-5, in 1990, ". Such" was substituted for "; such" in the middle of paragraph (a)(3) and a comma was deleted following "programs" in paragraph (a)(5).

12-8-65.2. Updating plans and reports; technical assistance; information available to public.

All large quantity hazardous waste generators shall complete and submit to the director a hazardous waste reduction plan on or before March 1, 1992. The plans shall be updated and progress reported on a biennial basis thereafter. The first updated biennial report shall be due in 1994 and shall be submitted to the director as prescribed in rules or regulations adopted by the board.

Subject to available funding, the Georgia Institute of Technology shall provide technical assistance, if requested, to hazardous waste generators in reducing the amount and toxicity of hazardous waste generated, in preparing hazardous waste reduction plans, and in preparing biennial progress reports.

The director shall maintain a copy of each hazardous waste reduction plan and biennial progress report received. This information shall be available to the public at the director's or the division's office.

(Code 1981, §

12-8-65.2

, enacted by Ga. L. 1990, p. 1427, § 2; Ga. L. 1992, p. 2234, § 5.)

12-8-65.3. Plans and reports by out-of-state generators storing, treating, or disposing of hazardous waste in state.

For the purposes of this Code section, "out-of-state generator" means any large quantity hazardous waste generator generating hazardous waste at a location outside the State of Georgia.

As a condition of allowing any out-of-state generator to store, treat, or dispose of hazardous waste at a hazardous waste disposal facility located within the State of Georgia, such out-of-state generator shall prepare and submit to the director upon his request a hazardous waste reduction plan and biennial hazardous waste reduction progress reports in substantial compliance with the requirements of Code Sections 12-8-65.1 and 12-8-65.2.

No hazardous waste disposal facility shall accept hazardous waste from an out-of-state generator unless the out-of-state generator presents to the owner or operator of the hazardous waste facility certification that the out-of-state generator is in compliance with the provisions of subsection (b) of this Code section. Such certification shall be made under oath or affirmation of the person making such certification that the contents of such certification are true and shall be made by a corporate officer, partner, or owner of such generator. It shall be unlawful to make a false statement on such certification and the making of a false statement shall be punishable as an act of false swearing under Code Section 16-10-71.

The requirements of Code Sections

12-8-65.1

and

12-8-65.2

and of subsections (a), (b), and (c) of this Code section shall not apply to any hazardous waste generator which is a generator as a consequence of any remediation or cleanup programs conducted either voluntarily or through legal actions under either the Resource Conservation and Recovery Act of 1976 (Public Law 94-580, 42 U.S.C. Section 6901, et seq.), as amended, or the Comprehensive Environmental Response, Compensation, and Liability Act of 1980 (Public Law 96-510), as amended, and shall not apply to a commercial hazardous waste treatment, storage, or disposal facility upon certification to the director that because of the nature of its business operation or process such facility cannot meet the waste reduction requirement prescribed under Code Sections

12-8-65.1

and

12-8-65.2

and subsections (a), (b), and (c) of this Code section. Such certification shall be made under oath or affirmation of the person making such certification that the contents of such certification are true and shall be made by a corporate officer, partner, or owner of such facility. It shall be unlawful to make a false statement on such certification and the making of such false statement shall be punishable as an act of false swearing under Code Section

16-10-71

.

(Code 1981, §

12-8-65.3

, enacted by Ga. L. 1990, p. 1427, § 2; Ga. L. 1992, p. 2234, § 5.)

12-8-65.4. Duplication of prior reporting requirements not required.

Nothing contained in Code Sections 12-8-65.1 through 12-8-65.3 or Code Section 12-8-66 shall require a duplication of reporting requirements under this article as it existed prior to July 1, 1990.

(Code 1981, §

12-8-65.4

, enacted by Ga. L. 1990, p. 1427, § 2; Ga. L. 1992, p. 2234, § 5.)

12-8-66. Permits for construction, installation, operation, or alteration of hazardous waste facilities.

No person shall, and it shall be unlawful and a violation of this part to, construct, install, operate, or substantially alter a hazardous waste facility without first obtaining and possessing a hazardous waste facility permit from the director. An application for a permit shall be submitted in such manner and on such forms as the director may prescribe. A permit shall be issued to an applicant on evidence, satisfactory to the director, of compliance with this part and any standards, requirements, or rules and regulations effective pursuant to this part.

The director may require that applications for such permits shall be accompanied by plans, data, specifications, engineering reports, designs, and such other information as the director deems necessary to make a determination of compliance with this part and the standards, requirements, or rules and regulations promulgated pursuant to this part.

The director may amend, modify, suspend, or revoke any permit issued for cause, including, but not limited to, the following:

Violation of any condition or provision of such permit or failure to comply with any final order of the director;

Failure to comply with this part or any rules or regulations promulgated pursuant to this part;

Obtaining a permit by misrepresentation or failure to disclose fully all relevant facts; or

When the permitted activity poses a threat to the environment or to the health of humans.

An application for a permit shall include a demonstration of financial responsibility, including, but not limited to, guarantees, liability insurance, the posting of bonds, or any combination of guarantees, liability insurance, or bonds in accordance with Code Section 12-8-68, which financial responsibility shall be related to the type and size of facility.

Permits issued under this Code section shall contain such terms and conditions, including conditions requiring corrective action beyond the facility boundary, as are deemed necessary by the director to protect the environment and the health of humans, and the director may require such testing and construction supervision as said officer deems necessary to protect the environment and the health of humans. Any permit issued subsequent to November 8, 1984, shall contain conditions requiring corrective action for any releases into the environment of hazardous waste or hazardous constituents at the facility seeking a permit, regardless of the time at which waste was placed at such facility.

In the event of denial, amendment, modification, suspension, or revocation of a permit, the director shall send written notice of such action to the permit holder or applicant and shall set forth in such notice the reason for the action.

The issuance, denial, amendment, modification, suspension, or revocation of any permit by the director shall become final unless a petition for hearing in accordance with Code Section 12-8-73 is filed.

Upon the first receipt of an application for a hazardous waste facility permit, the director, within 15 days, shall provide to the government of the county in which the facility is located or is proposed to be located, to each city government located wholly or partially within that county, and to the government of each county and city having territorial boundaries within two miles of the hazardous waste facility, or proposed hazardous waste facility a written notice indicating that an application has been received and describing the hazardous waste activities the applicant proposes to conduct. Within a 30 day period after first receipt of such application, the director shall also publish in at least one local newspaper of general circulation in the county a public notice that an application for a hazardous waste facility permit has been received. A public hearing shall be held if such is requested in writing within 30 days after publication of notification and is requested by 25 or more persons who claim to be affected by the pending permit application, by a governmental subdivision, or by an association having not fewer than 25 members. If requested, the public hearing shall be conducted at the county seat of the county in which the hazardous waste facility is proposed to be located. At least 45 days prior to the date of the public hearing, the director shall provide written notice to the various local governmental subdivisions and other interested parties in the locality in which the proposed facility may be located that a public hearing has been requested, which written notice shall also include the date, time, location, and purpose of the public hearing. The date, time, location, and purpose of such public hearing shall be advertised in the legal organ of the county in which the facility is proposed at least 45 days in advance of the date set for the hearing. Such public hearings shall be held for the purpose of receiving comments and suggestions concerning the location and requirements for the operation of a hazardous waste facility. The director shall consider fully all written and oral submissions regarding the proposed facility and the pending application.

Any person who owns or operates a facility required to have a permit under this Code section, which facility was in existence on November 19, 1980, or is in existence on the effective date of any amendment to this part or any regulation promulgated pursuant to this part which renders the facility subject to the requirement to have a permit pursuant to this Code section shall be accorded interim status, which means that such person shall be treated as having been issued a permit until such time as final administrative disposition of the person's application has been made, if and to the extent the person:

Has notified the director of the existence of such facility as required pursuant to paragraph (17) of subsection (a) of Code Section 12-8-65;

Has filed an application for a permit as required pursuant to this Code section;

Furnishes to the director information reasonably required or requested for processing such application;

Does not treat, store, or dispose of hazardous waste not specified in the permit application, nor employ processes not specified in the permit application, nor exceed the design capacity specified in the permit application; and

Complies with all standards applicable to interim status facilities as have been or may be promulgated by the board.

In the case of any land disposal facility which had interim status prior to November 8, 1984, interim status shall terminate on November 8, 1985, unless the owner or operator of such facility:

Applies for a final determination regarding the issuance of a permit pursuant to this Code section for such facility prior to November 8, 1985; and

Certifies that such facility is in compliance with all applicable ground-water monitoring and financial responsibility requirements.

In the case of any land disposal facility that has interim status due to any amendments to this part or any regulations promulgated pursuant to this part on or subsequent to November 8, 1984, which render the facility subject to the requirement to have a permit pursuant to this part, interim status shall terminate on the date 12 months after the date on which the facility first becomes subject to such permit requirement unless the owner or operator of such facility:

Applies for a final determination regarding the issuance of a permit pursuant to this Code section for such facility before the date 12 months after the date on which the facility first becomes subject to such permit requirement; and

Certifies that such facility is in compliance with all applicable ground-water monitoring and financial responsibility requirements.

In the case of any hazardous waste incinerator which had interim status prior to November 8, 1984, interim status shall terminate on November 8, 1989, unless the owner or operator of such facility applies for a final determination regarding the issuance of a permit pursuant to this Code section for such facility prior to November 8, 1986.

In the case of all hazardous waste facilities which had interim status prior to November 8, 1984, other than land disposal facilities and incinerators, interim status shall terminate on November 8, 1992, unless the owner or operator of such facility applies for a final determination regarding the issuance of a permit pursuant to this Code section for such facility prior to November 8, 1988.

In the case of all hazardous waste facilities in existence on November 8, 1984, the director must make a decision to issue or deny a permit pursuant to this Code section by the following dates:

By November 8, 1988, for all land disposal facilities;

By November 8, 1989, for all incinerators; and

By November 8, 1992, for all other hazardous waste facilities.

The director shall not issue a permit allowing any owner or operator of a cement kiln to burn hazardous waste as fuel until the U.S. Environmental Protection Agency has completed developing its strategy for hazardous waste reduction and combustion which may affect the burning of hazardous wastes in cement kilns.

(Ga. L. 1979, p. 1127, § 8; Ga. L. 1982, p. 3, § 12; Ga. L. 1985, p. 266, §§ 4, 5; Ga. L. 1986, p. 10, § 12; Ga. L. 1989, p. 240, § 1; Ga. L. 1990, p. 1427, § 3; Ga. L. 1992, p. 2234, § 5; Ga. L. 1993, p. 500, § 2; Ga. L. 1994, p. 483, § 1.)

Code Commission notes.

- Pursuant to Code Section 28-9-5, in 1990, the paragraph (1) designation in subsection (h) was deleted and a comma was deleted preceding "a written notice" near the end of the first sentence in subsection (h).

12-8-67. Hazardous waste in transit to be accompanied by manifest.

No hazardous waste shall be transported across, within, or through this state unless it is accompanied by a manifest properly issued, completed, and filled out in accordance with the rules and regulations promulgated by the board. The manifest shall accompany all hazardous waste from the point of generation through handling, storage, treatment, and disposal. A copy of the manifest shall be transmitted to the director as often as is required by the rules and regulations adopted by the board pursuant to this article.

(Ga. L. 1979, p. 1127, § 9; Ga. L. 1992, p. 2234, § 5.)